Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.405

Participation in high school completion pilot program—Eligible students—Funding allocations—Rules—Information for students and parents.

(1) For purposes of this section and *RCW 28B.50.534, "eligible student" means a student who has completed all state and local high school graduation requirements except the certificate of academic achievement under **RCW 28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement under RCW 28A.155.045, who is less than age twenty-one as of September 1st of the academic year the student enrolls at a community and technical college under this section, and who meets the following criteria:

(a) Receives a level 2 (basic) score on the reading and writing content areas of the high school statewide student assessment;

(b) Has not successfully met state standards on a retake of the assessment or an alternative assessment;

(c) Has participated in assessment remediation; and

(d) Receives a recommendation to enroll in courses or a program of study made available under *RCW 28B.50.534 from his or her high school principal.

(2) An eligible student may enroll in courses or a program of study made available by a community or technical college participating in the pilot program created under *RCW 28B.50.534 for the purpose of obtaining a high school diploma.

(3) For eligible students in courses or programs delivered directly by the community or technical college participating in the pilot program under *RCW 28B.50.534 and only for enrollment in courses that lead to a high school diploma, the superintendent of public instruction shall transmit to the colleges participating in the pilot program an amount per each full-time equivalent college student at statewide uniform rates. The amount shall be the sum of (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection, as applicable.

(a) The superintendent shall separately calculate and allocate moneys appropriated for basic education under RCW 28A.150.260 for purposes of making payments under this section. The calculations and allocations shall be based upon the estimated statewide annual average per full-time equivalent high school student allocations under RCW 28A.150.260, excluding small high school enhancements, and applicable rules adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(b) The superintendent shall allocate an amount equal to the per funded student state allocation for the learning assistance program under chapter 28A.165 RCW for each full-time equivalent college student or a pro rata amount for less than full-time enrollment.

(c) For eligible students who meet eligibility criteria for the state transitional bilingual instruction program under chapter 28A.180 RCW, the superintendent shall allocate an amount equal to the per student state allocation for the transitional bilingual instruction program or a pro rata amount for less than full-time enrollment.

(4) The superintendent may adopt rules establishing enrollment reporting, recordkeeping, and accounting requirements necessary to ensure accountability for the use of basic education, learning assistance, and transitional bilingual program funds under this section for the pilot program created under *RCW 28B.50.534.

(5) All school districts in the geographic area of the two community and technical colleges selected pursuant to section 8, chapter 355, Laws of 2007 to participate in the pilot program shall provide information about the high school completion option under *RCW 28B.50.534 to students in grades ten, eleven, and twelve and the parents or guardians of those students.

[ 2012 1st sp.s. c 10 s 4; 2007 c 355 s 4.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 28B.50.534 expired August 1, 2015, pursuant to 2015 c 55 s 122.

**(2) RCW 28A.655.061 expired August 31, 2022.

Purpose—Construction—2012 1st sp.s. c 10: See note following RCW 84.52.0531.

Finding—Intent—2007 c 355: See note following RCW 28B.50.535.